Maine, session 132, LD650.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §453 is repealed and the following enacted in its place:
§453. Local board of health
1. Membership; administration. A municipality may appoint a local board of health
consisting of a minimum of 3 and a maximum of 7 members besides the local health officer
appointed pursuant to section 451, one of whom must be a physician, an advanced practice
nurse or a physician assistant, if available in the community. Appointees must have
knowledge, education and experience in medicine or public health, including but not
limited to community mental health, public health nursing, public and community health,
social work and communications. To the extent possible, the board must be representative
of the population served. When first appointed, members of the board must be appointed
one for one year, one for 2 years and one for 3 years. Subsequent appointments must be for
3-year terms. The local health officer is secretary ex officio of the local board of health and
shall keep a record of all proceedings. The local board of health constitutes an advisory
body to the local health officer.
2. Authorities of board. A local board of health shall prioritize activities overseen by
the local health officer and may:
A. In consultation with the Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention, educate
the public about health issues as long as those educational activities do not conflict
with law, ordinance, bylaw or any fire, health or safety rule and are based in scientific
approaches;
B. Propose ordinances to the local legislative body for the promotion of general health
as long as those ordinances do not conflict with other law, ordinance, bylaw or any fire,
health or safety rule;
C. Advise local select boards, council and staff on public health issues outside of the
expertise of the local health officer, but shall prioritize activities overseen by the local
health officer;
D. Advise other municipal departments, volunteer boards and commissions; and
Page 1 - 132LR0855(03)

E. Collaborate with nonprofit organizations, businesses and other entities to support
local public health work.
A local board of health may not direct the work of the local health officer or any other
employee or appointed official of the municipality.
3. Funding. A local board of health may request permission from the municipality to
apply for outside funding. All outside funding received by a local board of health is subject
to municipal financial processes and procedures.
Page 2 - 132LR0855(03)